Connecticut, session 2026, HB05580.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 2 of public act 18-154 is amended to read as follows
(Effective from passage):
(a) Notwithstanding [a] certain [restriction] restrictions contained in
a Quit Claim Deed from the State of Connecticut, Highway
Commissioner to the town of Stratford, dated August, 1968, and
recorded in the Town of Stratford Land Records in Volume 445, pages
670 to 672, inclusive, that the parcel of land described in said deed shall
be used for "school purposes only" and is not to be sold, said [restriction
is] restrictions are released, relinquished and [has] have no further force
and effect. The town of Stratford may use said parcel for [municipal]
parking purposes only, and may sell, transfer or lease said parcel for
parking purposes. If at any time the parcel is used for any other purpose,
the parcel shall revert to the state of Connecticut. Any sale or lease of
said parcels shall be made at a cost equal to the fair market value of said
parcels, as approved by Commissioner of Transportation prior to the
actual sale or lease. Any moneys received by the town of Stratford from
any such sale, transfer or lease of said parcel shall be paid promptly to

Substitute House Bill No. 5580
the State Treasurer and deposited in the Special Transportation Fund.
(b) The State Treasurer shall execute and deliver any deed or
instrument necessary to implement the provisions of this section, which
deed or instrument shall include provisions to carry out the purposes of
subsection (a) of this section. The Commissioner of Transportation shall
have the sole responsibility for all other incidents of the release of the
restrictions under this section.
Governor's Action:
Approved June 4, 2026
Special Act No. 26-21 2 of 2